Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB660.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 176 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "resurfacing project" means any project undertaken by
the department to resurface, rehabilitate, or otherwise improve the paved surface
of a state-maintained highway for which the scope of work will result in a
permanent reduction in the number of through traffic lanes on any portion of the
highway.
(2) No later than sixty (60) days prior to the letting date for any resurfacing project,
the department shall notify, in writing, the mayor or chief administrative officer
of any city:
(a) Where a road segment on which the resurfacing project being conducted
will occur is within city boundaries; or
(b) That maintains a public road or access point providing direct vehicular
access to a road segment on which the resurfacing project will be
conducted.
(3) The notification required under subsection (2) of this section shall include:
(a) A description of the project;
(b) The proposed lane configuration after project completion; and
(c) Supporting plans or diagrams showing the design for the project.
(4) Any city that receives a notification of a resurfacing project under this section
may, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notification, submit written feedback
or comments on the project, including any concerns regarding local traffic
patterns, safety, economic impacts, or alternative configuration suggestions.
(5) The department shall consider all timely feedback received and submit a formal
response to any city that provides feedback, but shall not be required to modify
Page 1 of 2
BR221100.100 - 2211 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2211
the project based on the feedback.
Page 2 of 2
BR221100.100 - 2211 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:29 PM Jacketed